Utah statutes.
53A-6-109.   Substitute teachers.

(1)  A substitute teacher need not hold a license to teach, but school districts are encouraged to hire licensed personnel as substitutes when available.

(2)  A person must submit to a background check under Section 53A-3-410 prior to employment as a substitute teacher.

(3)  A teacher's position in the classroom may not be filled by unlicensed substitute teachers for more than a total of 20 days during any school year unless licensed personnel are not available.

(4)  A person who is ineligible to hold a license for any reason other than professional preparation may not serve as a substitute teacher.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

